Utah statutes.
72-6-202.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "High occupancy toll lane" has the same meaning as defined in Section
72-6-118.
(2)  "Toll" has the same meaning as defined in Section 72-6-118.
(3)  "Toll lane" has the same meaning as defined in Section 72-6-118.
(4)  "Tollway" has the same meaning as defined in Section 72-6-118.
(5) (a)  "Tollway development agreement" means a contractual agreement with a
public or private entity that provides for any predevelopment activities,
design, construction, reconstruction, financing, acquisition, maintenance, or
operation of a tollway or any or all of them.
(b)  "Tollway development agreement" may include:
(i)  predevelopment agreements;
(ii)  franchise and concession agreements;
(iii)  leases;
(iv)  right-of-entry agreements;
(v)  financial participation agreements;
(vi)  other financing agreements;
(vii)  design-build agreements;
(viii)  operating agreements;
(ix)  agreements for services of independent engineers;
(x)  agreements for the enforcement of tolls on a tollway; or
(xi)  any combination of Subsections (5)(b)(i) through (x).
